Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
SUBPART B
CONTEST OF VALIDITY OR ENFORCEMENT

14-5-605. Notice of registration of order.

When a support order or income-withholding order issued in another state or a foreign support order is registered, the registering tribunal of this state shall notify the nonregistering party. The notice must be accompanied by a copy of the registered order and the documents and relevant information accompanying the order.

A notice must inform the nonregistering party:

That a registered order is enforceable as of the date of registration in the same manner as an order issued by a tribunal of this state;

That a hearing to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order must be requested within twenty days after notice unless the registered order is under section 14-5-707;

That failure to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order in a timely manner will result in confirmation of the order and enforcement of the order and the alleged arrearages; and

Of the amount of any alleged arrearages.

If the registering party asserts that two or more orders are in effect, a notice must also:

(1) Identify the two or more orders and the order alleged by the registering party to be the controlling order and the consolidated arrears, if any;

(2) Notify the nonregistering party of the right to a determination of which is the controlling order;

(3) State that the procedures provided in subsection (b) of this section apply to the determination of which is the controlling order; and

(4) State that failure to contest the validity or enforcement of the order alleged to be the controlling order in a timely manner may result in confirmation that the order is the controlling order.

Upon registration of an income-withholding order for enforcement, the support enforcement agency or the registering tribunal shall notify the obligor's employer pursuant to the income-withholding law of this state.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1597, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(a) and (b)(2) amended, p. 540, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(b) and (c) amended and (d) added, p. 1259, § 35, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2015:

Entire part amended, (HB 15-1198), ch. 173, p. 557, § 31, effective July 1.

COMMENT

Subsection (a) requires the registering tribunal to provide notice to the nonregistering party of the effect of registration. After such notice is given, absent a successful contest by the nonregistering party, the order will be confirmed and future contest will be precluded. The notice contemplates far more than merely announcing an intent to initiate enforcement of an existing support order. The registered order or orders and other relevant documents and information must accompany the notice, including details about the alleged arrears.

Subsection (b) provides the nonregistering party with a wealth of information about the proceeding, including that: (1) the order is immediately enforceable; (2) a hearing must be requested within a relatively short time; (3) failure to contest "will result" in a confirmation of the order (roughly the equivalent of a default judgment); and (4) the amount of arrears, if any. Initially subsection (b) made the suggestion, via brackets, that [20] days be the time within which a request for a hearing to contest the support order be made. The rationale for this relatively short period was that the matter had already been litigated, and the obligor had already had the requisite "day in court," and was allegedly in default of a known order. Moreover, advocates of child-support enforcement stressed the necessity of quick resolution of an instance of nonsupport.

On the other hand, the Convention requires notice of hearing to be within a fixed time of 30 days, and further a fixed time of 60 days if the respondent resides in a foreign country. See Convention art. 23(6). This difference between UIFSA and the Convention is accommodated in Section 707. The time frame for notice of registration for an interstate support order and a foreign support order not subject to the Convention will be established by local law.

Subsection (c) is the correlative to Section 602 regarding the notice to be given to the nonregistering party if determination of a controlling order must be made because of the existence of two or more child-support orders. The petitioner requesting this affirmative relief is directed to identify the order alleged to be controlling under Section 207.

Subsection (d) states the obvious; i.e., the obligor's employer also must be notified if income is to be withheld. Often this will not be necessary if the employer has already been notified by the responding state's enforcement agency via the administrative process established in Section 507.

Related to Convention: art. 20. Bases for recognition and enforcement; art. 23. Procedure on an application for recognition and enforcement.

14-5-606. Procedure to contest validity or enforcement of registered support order.

A nonregistering party seeking to contest the validity or enforcement of a registered support order in this state shall request a hearing within the time required by section 14-5-605. The nonregistering party may seek to vacate the registration, to assert any defense to an allegation of noncompliance with the registered order, or to contest the remedies being sought or the amount of any alleged arrearages pursuant to section 14-5-607.

If the nonregistering party fails to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered support order in a timely manner, the order is confirmed by operation of law.

If a nonregistering party requests a hearing to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered support order, the registering tribunal shall schedule the matter for hearing and give notice to the parties of the date, time, and place of the hearing.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1598, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(a) and (c) amended, p. 541, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(a) amended, p. 1260, § 36, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2015:

Entire part amended, (HB 15-1198), ch. 173, p. 557, § 31, effective July 1.

COMMENT

Subsection (a) directs the "nonregistering party" to contest the registration of an interstate support order or a foreign support order not subject to the Convention within a short period of time or forfeit the opportunity to contest. As noted in Section 605, that time frame is extended for cases subject to the Convention.

Notice of registration is the first step for enforcement or modification of another state's child-support order. Once the nonregistering party is put on notice of the registration, if an error allegedly has been made, the second step is crucial. The nonregistering party is required to assert any existing defense to the alleged controlling order, or forfeit the opportunity to contest the allegations. Note that either the obligor or the obligee may have objections to the registered order, although in the vast majority of cases the obligor is the nonregistering party.

On the other hand, there is a possibility that in multiple-order situations either party may register the order most favorable to that party rather than register the likely controlling order, thus triggering a contest. Deliberately furnishing misinformation regarding the controlling order doubtless constitutes chicanery, which is contrary to Section 605(c). When a support enforcement agency requests registration, Section 307(c) requires reasonable efforts to ensure registration of the proper controlling order. Nonetheless, there may be an honest difference of opinion as to which order controls. The nonregistering obligor has a significant stake in assuring that both the order and the arrears are correctly stated.

Under UIFSA a contest of the fundamental provisions of the registered order is not permitted in the responding state. The nonregistering party must return to the issuing state or foreign country to prosecute such a contest (only as the law of that state or foreign country permits). This approach is akin to the prohibition found in Section 315 against asserting a nonparentage defense in a UIFSA proceeding. There is no attempt by UIFSA to preclude a collateral attack on the support order from being litigated in the appropriate forum.

Subsection (b) precludes an untimely contest of a registered support order.

Subsection (c) directs that a hearing be scheduled when the nonregistering party contests some aspect of the registration.

Related to Convention: art. 20. Bases for recognition and enforcement; art. 22. Grounds for refusing recognition and enforcement; art. 23. Procedure on an application for recognition and enforcement; art. 26. Procedure on an application for recognition.

14-5-607. Contest of registration or enforcement.

A party contesting the validity or enforcement of a registered support order or seeking to vacate the registration has the burden of proving one or more of the following defenses:

The issuing tribunal lacked personal jurisdiction over the contesting party;

The order was obtained by fraud;

The order has been vacated, suspended, or modified by a later order;

The issuing tribunal has stayed the order pending appeal;

There is a defense under the law of this state to the remedy sought;

Full or partial payment has been made;

The statute of limitation under section 14-5-604 precludes enforcement of some or all of the alleged arrearages; or

The alleged controlling order is not the controlling order.

If a party presents evidence establishing a full or partial defense under subsection (a) of this section, a tribunal may stay enforcement of a registered support order, continue the proceeding to permit production of additional relevant evidence, and issue other appropriate orders. An uncontested portion of the registered support order may be enforced by all remedies available under the law of this state.

If the contesting party does not establish a defense under subsection (a) of this section to the validity or enforcement of a registered support order, the registering tribunal shall issue an order confirming the order.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1598, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2003:

(a)(6) and (a)(7) amended and (a)(8) added, p. 1260, § 37, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2015:

Entire part amended, (HB 15-1198), ch. 173, p. 558, § 31, effective July 1.

COMMENT

Subsection (a) places the burden on the nonregistering party to assert narrowly defined defenses to registration of a support order. The first of the listed defenses, lack of personal jurisdiction over the nonregistering party in the original proceeding, is undoubtedly the most widely discussed topic. It appears that at the appellate level, several of the other listed defenses are more commonly asserted. The decision in Kulko v. Superior Court, 436 U.S. 84 (1978) was somewhat controversial when delivered, and has remained so, at least in the international context. As a practical matter, however, the requirement that a support order be based on personal jurisdiction over both parties but primarily the obligor is a well-established fixture in the jurisprudence of the United States; relatively few appellate cases on this subject have been reported.

A nonregistering obligor may assert a wide variety of listed defenses, such as "payment" or "the obligation has terminated," in response to allegations of noncompliance with the registered order. There is no defense, however, to registration of a valid foreign support order. The nonregistering party also may contest the allegedly controlling order because its terms have been modified. Or, the defense may be based on the existence of a different controlling order.

See

Section 207. Presumably this defense must be substantiated by registration of the alleged controlling order to be effective.

While subsection (a)(6) is couched in terms that imply the defense to the amount of alleged arrears can only be that they are less, the converse is also available. For example, if the registering party is the obligor and asserts an amount of arrears that the obligee believes is too low, as the nonregistering party the obligee must contest to preclude confirmation of the alleged amount.

In the absence of a valid defense, if the obligor is found to be liable for current support, the registering tribunal must enter an order to enforce that obligation. Additional proof of arrearages must also result in enforcement under the Bradley Amendment, 42 U.S.C. Section 666(a)(10), which requires all states to treat child-support payments as final judgments as they come due (or lose federal funding). Therefore, federal law precludes arrearages from being subject to retroactive modification. Future modification of a child support order from another state is governed by Sections 609-614, and Sections 615-616 regulate modification of foreign child support orders.

Subsection (c) provides that failure to contest a registered order successfully requires the tribunal to confirm the validity of the registered order.

Related to Convention: art. 26. Procedure on an application for recognition.

14-5-608. Confirmed order.

Confirmation of a registered support order, whether by operation of law or after notice and hearing, precludes further contest of the order with respect to any matter that could have been asserted at the time of registration.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1599, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2015:

Entire part amended, (HB 15-1198), ch. 173, p. 558, § 31, effective July 1.

COMMENT

If, after notice, the nonregistering party fails to contest, the registered support order is confirmed by operation of law and no further action by a responding tribunal is necessary. Although the statute is not explicit on the subject, it seems likely in the absence of a contest both the registering and nonregistering party would be estopped from subsequently collaterally attacking the confirmed order, whether on the basis that "the wrong order was registered" or otherwise.

If contested, a registered support order must be confirmed by the responding tribunal if, after a hearing, the defenses authorized in Section 607 are rejected. Thus, either scenario precludes the nonregistering party from raising any issue that could have been asserted in a hearing. Confirmation of a support order, whether by action or as the result of inaction, validates both the terms of the order and the asserted arrearages.

Related to Convention: art. 22. Grounds for refusing recognition and enforcement; art. 26. Procedure on an application for recognition.